Washington statutes.
RCW 13.40.511

Community juvenile accountability programs—Stop loss policy—Funding for juvenile courts—Report to legislature.

(1) As of July 28, 2019, the block grant oversight committee must implement a stop loss policy when allocating funding under RCW 13.40.510. The stop loss policy must limit the loss in funding for any juvenile court from one year to the next. The block grant oversight committee must establish a minimum base level of funding for juvenile courts with lower numbers of at-risk youth ten years of age and over but under eighteen years of age. The department of children, youth, and families must report, in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, to the legislature by December 1, 2019, about how funding is used for referred youth and the impact of that use on overall use of funding.

(2) For purposes of this section, "block grant oversight committee" means a committee established by the juvenile rehabilitation division of the department of children, youth, and families and the juvenile courts that provides block grant funding formula oversight with equal representation from the juvenile rehabilitation division of the department of children, youth, and families and the juvenile courts. The purpose of this committee is to assess the ongoing implementation of the block grant funding formula, utilizing data-driven decision making and the most current available information. The committee is cochaired by the juvenile rehabilitation division of the department of children, youth, and families and the juvenile courts, who have the ability to change members of the committee as needed to achieve its purpose.

[ 2019 c 461 s 3.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: Although 2019 c 461 s 3 did not include a codification directive, codification in chapter 13.40 RCW appears to be appropriate.